Maryland, session 2026, HB0299.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – General Provisions
8–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) (1) “Claim” means a request or demand, under a contract or otherwise, for
money or other property, whether or not the governmental entity has title to the money or
property, that is:
(i) presented to an officer, employee, or agent of a governmental
entity; or
(ii) made to a contractor, a grantee, or another recipient, if the
money or other property is to be spent or used on a governmental entity’s behalf or to
advance an interest of a governmental entity, and the governmental entity:
1. provides or has provided any portion of the money or other
property requested or demanded; or
2. will reimburse the contractor, grantee, or other recipient
for any portion of the money or other property that is requested or demanded.
(2) [“Claim”] EXCEPT WITH RESPECT TO §§ 8–102(B)(9) AND
8–109(C)(2)(III) OF THIS TITLE, “CLAIM” does not include requests or demands for
money or other property that a governmental entity has paid to an individual as
compensation for employment or as an income subsidy with no restrictions on that
individual’s use of the money or other property.
8–102.
(a) [This] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B)(9) OF THIS SECTION,
THIS section does not apply to claims, records, or statements related to State or local taxes.
(b) A person may not:
(8) knowingly conceal, or knowingly and improperly avoid or decrease, an
obligation to pay or transmit money or other property to a governmental entity, including
misrepresenting the time at which a trade was made to make the transaction appear less
favorable; [or]

HOUSE BILL 299
(9) KNOWINGLY MAKE, USE, OR CAUSE TO BE MADE OR USED, A FALSE
RECORD OR STATEMENT RESULTING IN:
(I) THE UNDERPAYMENT OF CONTRIBUTIONS OWED TO THE
UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE FUND; OR
(II) THE PAYMENT OF UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE BENEFITS
OF MORE THAN $15,000 IN A CALENDAR YEAR; OR
[(9)] (10) knowingly make any other false or fraudulent claim against a
governmental entity.
8–109.
(b) (1) (I) The governmental entity shall make all reasonable efforts to
coordinate any investigation of an alleged violation under this title with any investigation
conducted by the federal government involving the same violation.
(II) THE COMMISSIONER OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY OR THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL COOPERATE IN THE INVESTIGATION OF AN ALLEGED
VIOLATION UNDER THIS TITLE THAT IS OF UNUSUAL SCOPE OR COMPLEXITY OR
INVOLVES A NOVEL OR COMPLEX LEGAL ISSUE, IF:
1. THE GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY WITH INVESTIGATIVE
AUTHORITY FOR THE ALLEGED VIOLATION IS THE COMMISSIONER OF LABOR AND
INDUSTRY OR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL; AND
2. THE ALLEGED VIOLATION IS OF A NATURE AND SCOPE
THAT COULD GIVE RISE TO A VIOLATION OR AN ACTION UNDER TITLE 3, SUBTITLE
9 OF THE LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT ARTICLE OR TITLE 16, TITLE 17, SUBTITLE 2,
OR TITLE 18 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(III) TO ASSIST IN THE ENFORCEMENT OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE
COMMISSIONER OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY AND THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL
SHARE INFORMATION ON A MONTHLY BASIS CONCERNING MATTERS ARISING UNDER
TITLE 3, SUBTITLE 9 OF THE LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT ARTICLE AND TITLE 16 AND
TITLE 17, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE,
INCLUDING:
1. THE CONTENT OF COMPLAINTS OR REFERRALS
RECEIVED CONCERNING POTENTIAL VIOLATIONS AND ACTIONS TAKEN; AND
2. THE STATUS OF INVESTIGATIONS INITIATED,
INCLUDING ANY DETERMINATION OF MERIT OR RECOVERY SOUGHT OR OBTAINED.

HOUSE BILL 299 5
(2) The governmental entity’s objective shall be to avoid unnecessary
duplication of effort on the part of the person alleged to have committed the violation and
to minimize the burden of the investigation on the person.
(c) (1) Except as provided under paragraph (2) of this subsection, the
Comptroller shall deposit any civil penalty or damages collected by the State under this
title into the General Fund of the State.
(2) (i) If a violation of this title affects any of the following funds, the
Comptroller shall deposit any civil penalty or damages collected by the State under this
title into the affected fund:
1. a fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of the State Finance
and Procurement Article;
2. a special fund requiring the reversion of appropriated
funds to the special fund under § 7–304 of the State Finance and Procurement Article;
3. a fund under the jurisdiction of the Board of Trustees for
the State Retirement and Pension System; [or]
4. a fund under the jurisdiction of the State Employee and
Retiree Health and Welfare Benefits Program; OR
5. THE UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE FUND.
(ii) If more than one fund is affected by a violation of this title, the
Comptroller shall deposit any civil penalty or damages collected by the State into the
appropriate fund or the General Fund of the State on a pro rata basis.
(III) IF A VIOLATION OF THIS TITLE INVOLVED THE FAILURE TO
PAY PREVAILING WAGE RATES IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 17, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE
STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE, CIVIL PENALTIES AND DAMAGES
COLLECTED UNDER THIS TITLE MAY BE USED TO PAY RESTITUTION TO AFFECTED
WORKERS.
Article – Labor and Employment
3–906.
(a) [After] WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER the employer has provided all the records
requested under § 3–905(d) of this subtitle, the Commissioner shall:
(1) issue a citation to the employer;

HOUSE BILL 299
(2) REFER THE MATTER TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 3–910 OF THIS SUBTITLE; or
(3) close the investigation [within 90 days].
(b) Each citation shall:
(1) describe in detail the nature of the alleged violation;
(2) cite the provision of this subtitle or any regulation that the employer is
alleged to have violated; and
(3) state the civil penalty, if any, that the Commissioner proposes to assess.
(c) Within a reasonable time after issuance of a citation, the Commissioner shall
send by certified mail to the employer:
(1) a copy of the citation; and
(2) notice of the opportunity to request a hearing.
(d) Within 15 days after an employer receives a notice under subsection (c) of this
section, the employer may submit a written request for a hearing on the citation and
proposed penalty.
(e) If a hearing is not requested within 15 days, the citation, including any
penalties, shall become a final order of the Commissioner.
(f) (1) If the employer requests a hearing, the Commissioner shall delegate to
the Office of Administrative Hearings the authority to hold a hearing and issue findings of
fact, conclusions of law, and an order, and assess a penalty under § 3–909 of this subtitle
in accordance with Title 10, Subtitle 2 of the State Government Article.
(2) The employer is entitled to a hearing within 90 days after a timely
request is made under this subsection, unless the employer waives that right.
(g) Within 15 days after a request, in accordance with Title 4 of the General
Provisions Article and the applicable regulations of the Department and the Office of
Administrative Hearings, the Commissioner shall provide copies of all relevant evidence,
including a list of potential witnesses, on which the Commissioner intends to rely at any
administrative hearing under this subtitle.
(h) The Commissioner has the burden of proof to show that an employer has
knowingly failed to properly classify an individual as an employee.
(i) A decision of an administrative law judge issued in accordance with Title 10,
Subtitle 2 of the State Government Article shall become a final order of the Commissioner.

HOUSE BILL 299 7
(j) Any party aggrieved by a final order of the Commissioner under subsection (i)
of this section may seek judicial review and appeal under §§ 10–222 and 10–223 of the State
Government Article.
(K) A GENERAL CONTRACTOR ON A PROJECT FOR CONSTRUCTION
SERVICES, INCLUDING A PROJECT CONTRACTED FOR BY A PUBLIC BODY, IS SUBJECT
TO CITATION AND JOINTLY AND SEVERALLY LIABLE FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS
SUBTITLE THAT IS COMMITTED BY A SUBCONTRACTOR, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER
THE SUBCONTRACTOR IS IN A DIRECT CONTRACTUAL RELATIONSHIP WITH THE
GENERAL CONTRACTOR.
3–908.
(a) An employer in violation of § 3–903 of this subtitle who comes into timely
compliance with all applicable labor laws as required by § 3–907(b) of this subtitle may not
be assessed a civil penalty.
(b) (1) An employer in violation of § 3–903 of this subtitle who fails to come
into timely compliance with all applicable labor laws as required by § 3–907(b) of this
subtitle shall be assessed a civil penalty of up to $1,000 for each employee for whom the
employer is not in compliance, ONE–THIRD OF WHICH IS PAYABLE DIRECTLY TO THE
INDIVIDUAL AFFECTED BY THE EMPLOYER’S VIOLATION, IN ADDITION TO ANY
OTHER RESTITUTION OR BENEFIT TO WHICH THE INDIVIDUAL MAY BE ENTITLED
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) In determining the amount of the penalty, the Commissioner shall
consider the factors set forth in § 3–909(b) of this subtitle.
(c) (1) An employer may be assessed civil penalties under this section by only
one final order of a court or administrative unit for the same actions constituting
noncompliance with applicable labor laws as required by § 3–907(b) and (c) of this subtitle.
(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subsection, an employer may be
ordered to make restitution, pay any interest due, and otherwise comply with all applicable
laws and regulations by multiple final orders of a court and all relevant administrative
units, including the Comptroller, the Office of Unemployment Insurance, the Insurance
Administration, and the Workers’ Compensation Commission.
(d) Any penalty issued under this section against an employer shall be in effect
against any successor corporation or business entity that:
(1) has one or more of the same principals or officers as the employer
against whom the penalty was assessed; and
(2) is engaged in the same or equivalent trade or activity.

HOUSE BILL 299
3–909.
(a) An employer found to have knowingly failed to properly classify an individual
in violation of § 3–904 of this subtitle shall be assessed a civil penalty of up to $10,000 for
each employee who was not properly classified, ONE–THIRD OF WHICH IS PAYABLE
DIRECTLY TO THE INDIVIDUAL AFFECTED BY THE EMPLOYER’S VIOLATION, IN
ADDITION TO ANY OTHER RESTITUTION OR BENEFIT TO WHICH THE INDIVIDUAL MAY
BE ENTITLED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(b) In determining the amount of the penalty, the Commissioner or the
administrative law judge shall consider:
(1) the gravity of the violation;
(2) the size of the employer’s business;
(3) the employer’s good faith;
(4) the employer’s history of violations under this subtitle; and
(5) whether the employer:
(i) has been found, by a court or an administrative unit, to have
deprived the employee of any rights to which the employee would have been entitled under
a State protective labor law, including but not limited to:
1. any provision of this article;
2. the State prevailing wage law, under §§ 17–221 and
17–222 of the State Finance and Procurement Article; or
3. the living wage law, under § 18–108 of the State Finance
and Procurement Article; and
(ii) has made restitution and come into compliance with all such
State protective labor laws with respect to the employee.
(c) If the court or an administrative unit determines that an individual or class
of individuals is entitled to restitution as a result of the employer’s violation of § 3–904 of
this subtitle, the court or administrative unit:
(1) shall award each individual any restitution to which the individual may
be entitled; and
(2) may award each individual an additional amount up to three times the
amount of such restitution.

HOUSE BILL 299 9
(d) An employer in violation of § 3–904 of this subtitle may be assessed double the
administrative penalties set forth in subsection (a) of this section if the employer has been
found previously to have violated this subtitle by a final order of a court or an
administrative unit.
(e) An employer who has been found by a final order of a court or an
administrative unit to have violated § 3–904 of this subtitle three or more times may be
assessed an administrative penalty of up to $20,000 for each employee.
(f) (1) An employer may be assessed civil penalties under this section or §
8–201.1 or § 9–402.1 of this article by only one final order of a court or administrative unit
for the same actions constituting a violation of this subtitle.
(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subsection, an employer may be
ordered to make restitution, pay any interest due, and otherwise comply with all applicable
laws and regulations by orders of a court and all relevant administrative units, including
the Comptroller, the Office of Unemployment Insurance, the Insurance Administration,
and the Workers’ Compensation Commission.
(g) Any penalty issued under this section against an employer shall be in effect
against any successor corporation or business entity that:
(1) has one or more of the same principals or officers as the employer
against whom the penalty was assessed, unless the principal or officer did not or with the
exercise of reasonable diligence could not know of the violation for which the penalty was
imposed; and
(2) is engaged in the same or equivalent trade or activity.
3–910.
(a) As authorized by State and federal law, units within the Maryland
Department of Labor and the Department of Budget and Management, the Secretary of
State, the Comptroller, the Maryland Insurance Administration, THE OFFICE OF THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL, and other State agencies shall cooperate and share information
concerning any suspected failure to properly classify an individual as an employee.
(b) On a showing by clear and convincing evidence that a violation of § 3–904 of
this subtitle has occurred and as authorized by federal and State law, the Commissioner
shall refer any complaint that alleges a violation of § 13–1007 or § 13–1024 of the Tax –
General Article to the:
(1) Comptroller;
(2) State’s Attorney with jurisdiction over the alleged violation;

HOUSE BILL 299
(3) U.S. Department of Justice;
(4) U.S. Department of Labor; and
(5) U.S. Department of the Treasury.
(C) (1) TO EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, TO ASSIST IN THE ENFORCEMENT OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE
COMMISSIONER AND THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, OR THEIR DESIGNEES, SHALL MEET
AT LEAST MONTHLY TO SHARE INFORMATION ON A MONTHLY BASIS CONCERNING
MATTERS ARISING UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, TITLE 8 OF THE GENERAL PROVISIONS
ARTICLE, AND TITLES 16 AND 18 AND TITLE 17, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE
FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE, INCLUDING AT A MINIMUM:
(I) THE CONTENT OF COMPLAINTS OR REFERRALS RECEIVED
CONCERNING POTENTIAL VIOLATIONS AND ACTIONS TAKEN; AND
(II) THE STATUS OF INVESTIGATIONS INITIATED, INCLUDING
ANY DETERMINATION OF MERIT OR RECOVERY SOUGHT OR OBTAINED.
(2) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL REFER TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
ANY COMPLAINT OR REFERRAL ARISING UNDER THIS SUBTITLE FOR WHICH THE
COMMISSIONER HAS:
(I) NOT INITIATED AN INVESTIGATION WITHIN 6 MONTHS
AFTER RECEIPT;
(II) DECLINED TO INVESTIGATE; OR
(III) NOT ISSUED A CITATION OR HAS CLOSED AN INVESTIGATION
IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 3–906(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE DUE TO A FINDING OF NO
MERIT.
(3) (I) IN A MATTER REFERRED TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY
EXERCISE THE COMMISSIONER’S INVESTIGATIVE POWERS, INCLUDING SUBPOENA
POWERS, PROVIDED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(II) IF, AFTER AN INVESTIGATION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
FINDS A MATTER TO BE MERITORIOUS, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL PROVIDE
NOTICE TO AND CONSULT WITH THE COMMISSIONER, AFTER WHICH THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL MAY BRING AN ACTION FOR:

HOUSE BILL 299 11
1. THE IMPOSITION OF CIVIL PENALTIES UNDER § 3–908
OR § 3–909 OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
2. THE RELIEF DESCRIBED UNDER § 3–911(C) OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(4) THE EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSIONER AND THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL
COOPERATE IN THE INVESTIGATION OF ANY MATTER ARISING UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE THAT IS OF UNUSUAL SCOPE OR COMPLEXITY OR INVOLVES A NOVEL OR
COMPLEX LEGAL ISSUE.
(5) (I) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY NOT BE COMPELLED TO
SHARE INFORMATION REGARDING, OR TO COOPERATE IN THE INVESTIGATION OF, A
CIVIL ACTION FILED UNDER SEAL IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 8–104 OF THE GENERAL
PROVISIONS ARTICLE.
(II) SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH DOES NOT
PROHIBIT THE ATTORNEY GENERAL FROM BEING COMPELLED TO COOPERATE IN
AN INVESTIGATION OF A CIVIL ACTION IF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL HAS
INTERVENED AND PROCEEDED WITH THE ACTION UNDER § 8–104(A)(6)(I) OF THE
GENERAL PROVISIONS ARTICLE.
3–911.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, an individual
who has not been properly classified as an employee may bring a civil action for economic
damages against the employer for any violation of this subtitle.
(2) An individual may not bring a civil action under this section if a final
order of an administrative unit or of a court has been issued under § 3–906 of this subtitle.
(b) An action filed under this section shall be filed within 3 years after the date
the cause of action accrues.
(c) If the court determines that an individual or class of individuals is entitled to
judgment in an action against an employer filed in accordance with this section, the court
may award each individual:
(1) any damages to which the individual may be entitled under subsection
(a) of this section;
(2) an additional amount up to three times the amount of any such
damages, if the employer knowingly failed to properly classify the individual;

HOUSE BILL 299
(3) reasonable counsel fees and other costs of the action; and
(4) any other appropriate relief.
3–912.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “LICENSE” MEANS A LICENSE, CERTIFICATE, REGISTRATION,
PERMIT, OR OTHER AUTHORIZATION THAT:
(I) IS ISSUED BY A LICENSING AUTHORITY;
(II) IS SUBJECT TO SUSPENSION, REVOCATION, FORFEITURE,
OR TERMINATION BY A LICENSING AUTHORITY; AND
(III) IS NECESSARY FOR A PERSON TO PRACTICE OR ENGAGE IN
A PARTICULAR BUSINESS, OCCUPATION, OR PROFESSION.
(3) “LICENSEE” MEANS AN EMPLOYER HOLDING A VALID LICENSE.
(4) (I) “LICENSING AUTHORITY” MEANS A UNIT OF THE DIVISION
OF OCCUPATIONAL AND PROFESSIONAL LICENSING IN THE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR.
(II) “LICENSING AUTHORITY” INCLUDES:
1. THE ELEVATOR SAFETY REVIEW BOARD;
2. THE MARYLAND HOME IMPROVEMENT COMMISSION;
3. THE STATE BOARD OF ELECTRICIANS;
4. THE STATE BOARD OF HEATING, VENTILATION,
AIR–CONDITIONING, AND REFRIGERATION CONTRACTORS;
5. THE STATE BOARD OF PLUMBING;
6. THE MARYLAND BOARD OF PUBLIC ACCOUNTANCY;
AND
7. THE MARYLAND BOARD OF INDIVIDUAL TAX
PREPARERS.

HOUSE BILL 299 13
(B) (1) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL NOTIFY THE APPLICABLE LICENSING
AUTHORITY WHEN A LICENSEE IS FOUND IN VIOLATION OF § 3–903 OF THIS
SUBTITLE BY A FINAL ORDER OF A COURT OR AN ADMINISTRATIVE UNIT AND THE
LICENSEE:
(I) HAS NOT PAID ALL PENALTIES ASSESSED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE FOR A VIOLATION OF § 3–903 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(II) WITHIN 45 DAYS AFTER ISSUANCE OF THE FINAL ORDER OF
A COURT OR ADMINISTRATIVE UNIT, HAS FAILED TO COMPLY WITH THE FINAL
ORDER ISSUED, INCLUDING PAYMENT OF RESTITUTION OWED, IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 3–907 OF THIS SUBTITLE FOR FAILING TO PROPERLY CLASSIFY AN
EMPLOYEE.
(2) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL NOTIFY THE APPLICABLE LICENSING
AUTHORITY WHEN A LICENSEE IS FOUND IN VIOLATION OF § 3–904 OR § 3–915 OF
THIS SUBTITLE BY A FINAL ORDER OF A COURT OR AN ADMINISTRATIVE UNIT.
(C) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, IF A LICENSING
AUTHORITY RECEIVES A NOTIFICATION MADE UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION, THE LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL SUSPEND OR REVOKE THE LICENSE OF
THE LICENSEE.
(D) (1) BEFORE SUSPENDING OR REVOKING A LICENSE UNDER
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, A LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL SEND WRITTEN
NOTICE OF THE PROPOSED ACTION TO THE LICENSEE WHOSE LICENSE IS SUBJECT
TO SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION, INCLUDING NOTICE OF THE LICENSEE’S RIGHT TO
CONTEST THE IDENTITY OF THE LICENSEE WHOSE LICENSE IS TO BE SUSPENDED OR
REVOKED.
(2) (I) A LICENSEE MAY APPEAL A DECISION OF A LICENSING
AUTHORITY TO SUSPEND OR REVOKE THE LICENSE IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 10,
SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(II) AT A HEARING INITIATED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH, THE ISSUE SHALL BE LIMITED TO WHETHER THE COMMISSIONER
HAS MISTAKEN THE IDENTITY OF THE LICENSEE WHOSE LICENSE HAS BEEN
SUSPENDED OR REVOKED.
(E) (1) A LICENSING AUTHORITY MAY NOT REINSTATE A LICENSE THAT
HAS BEEN SUSPENDED OR REVOKED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION
BASED ON A NOTIFICATION MADE UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION

HOUSE BILL 299
UNTIL THE COMMISSIONER PROVIDES NOTICE TO THE LICENSING AUTHORITY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL NOTIFY THE LICENSING AUTHORITY
WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER THE COMMISSIONER FIRST RECEIVES:
(I) A COURT ORDER TO REINSTATE THE LICENSE; OR
(II) WITH RESPECT TO A LICENSEE WHO IS SUBJECT TO A FINAL
ORDER OF A COURT OR AN ADMINISTRATIVE UNIT TO PAY PENALTIES OR
RESTITUTION FOR A VIOLATION OF § 3–903 OF THIS SUBTITLE, NOTICE THAT THE
LICENSEE HAS COMPLIED WITH THE ORDER AND PAID ALL PENALTIES AND
RESTITUTION IN FULL.
(3) A LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL IMMEDIATELY REINSTATE ANY
LICENSE SUSPENDED OR REVOKED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION IF:
(I) NOTIFIED BY THE COMMISSIONER THAT THE LICENSE
SHOULD BE REINSTATED; AND
(II) THE LICENSEE OTHERWISE QUALIFIES FOR THE LICENSE.
(4) A LICENSING AUTHORITY MAY NOT REINSTATE A LICENSE THAT
HAS BEEN SUSPENDED OR REVOKED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION
BASED ON A NOTIFICATION UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(2) OF THIS SECTION UNTIL:
(I) THE INDIVIDUAL WHOSE LICENSE HAS BEEN REVOKED OR
SUSPENDED SUBMITS A WRITTEN REQUEST TO THE LICENSING AUTHORITY;
(II) THE LICENSING AUTHORITY HOLDS A HEARING ON THE
REQUEST;
(III) THE LICENSING AUTHORITY, BY AN AFFIRMATIVE VOTE OF
A MAJORITY OF ITS MEMBERS:
1. DETERMINES THAT THE INDIVIDUAL HAS
DEMONSTRATED BY A PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE THAT ANY CONDITIONS
OF THE SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION HAVE BEEN FULFILLED; AND
2. VOTES TO REINSTATE THE LICENSE; AND
(IV) THE INDIVIDUAL PAYS TO THE LICENSING AUTHORITY ANY
REINSTATEMENT FEE SET BY THE LICENSING AUTHORITY.

HOUSE BILL 299 15
(F) (1) ADVERSE LICENSING ACTIONS TAKEN UNDER THIS SECTION MAY
BE IMPOSED IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER ACTIONS TAKEN IN THE ENFORCEMENT OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) ADVERSE LICENSING ACTIONS TAKEN UNDER THIS SECTION
SHALL BE IN EFFECT AGAINST:
(I) ANY SUCCESSOR CORPORATION OR BUSINESS ENTITY THAT:
1. HAS ONE OR MORE OF THE SAME PRINCIPALS OR
OFFICERS AS THE LICENSEE AGAINST WHOM THE ADVERSE ACTION WAS TAKEN
UNLESS THE PRINCIPAL OR OFFICER DID NOT OR, WITH THE EXERCISE OF
REASONABLE DILIGENCE, COULD NOT HAVE KNOWN OF THE VIOLATION FOR WHICH
THE ADVERSE ACTION WAS TAKEN; AND
2. IS ENGAGED IN OR INTENDS TO ENGAGE IN THE SAME
OR EQUIVALENT TRADE OR ACTIVITY; AND
(II) ANY INDIVIDUAL LICENSEE THAT WAS AN OFFICER, A
DIRECTOR, A CONTROLLING SHAREHOLDER, A PARTNER, OR A MANAGER OF THE
EMPLOYER AGAINST WHOM THE ADVERSE ACTION WAS TAKEN UNLESS THE
OFFICER, DIRECTOR, CONTROLLING SHAREHOLDER, PARTNER, OR MANAGER DID
NOT OR, WITH THE EXERCISE OF REASONABLE DILIGENCE, COULD NOT HAVE KNOWN
OF THE VIOLATION FOR WHICH THE ADVERSE ACTION WAS TAKEN.
3–913.
(a) Where, after investigation, the Commissioner issues a citation for a knowing
violation of this subtitle or regulations adopted under this subtitle by an employer engaged
in work on a contract with a public body, the Commissioner shall promptly notify the public
body AND THE GENERAL CONTRACTOR.
(b) (1) On notification, the public body shall withhold from payment due the
employer an amount that is sufficient to:
(i) pay restitution to each employee for the full amount of wages
due; and
(ii) pay any benefits, taxes, or other contributions that are required
by law to be paid on behalf of the employee.
(2) The public body shall release:

HOUSE BILL 299
(i) on issuance of a favorable final order of a court or an
administrative unit, the full amount of the withheld funds; and
(ii) on an adverse final order of a court or an administrative unit, the
balance of the withheld funds after all obligations are satisfied under paragraph (1) of this
subsection.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
16–203.
(a) A person may be debarred from entering into a contract with the State if the
person, an officer, partner, controlling stockholder or principal of that person, or any other
person substantially involved in that person’s contracting activities has:
(9) been found to have REPEATEDLY OR willfully or knowingly violated
Title 17, Subtitle 2 or Title 18 of this article if:
(i) 1. the finding was made by a court; and
2. the decision of the court became final; or
(ii) 1. the finding was made IN ACCORDANCE WITH A FINAL
ADMINISTRATIVE ORDER OR in a contested case under the Administrative Procedure Act;
and
2. IF MADE IN A CONTESTED CASE, the finding was not
overturned on judicial review;
(10) been found to have REPEATEDLY OR willfully or knowingly violated
Title 3, Subtitle 3, Subtitle 4, [or] Subtitle 5, OR SUBTITLE 9 or Title 5 of the Labor and
Employment Article if:
(i) 1. the finding was made by a court; and
2. the decision of the court became final; or
(ii) 1. the finding was made IN ACCORDANCE WITH A FINAL
ADMINISTRATIVE ORDER OR in a contested case under the Administrative Procedure Act;
and
2. IF MADE IN A CONTESTED CASE, the finding was not
overturned on judicial review;
17–221.

HOUSE BILL 299 17
(g) If after investigation, the Commissioner determines that a provision of this
subtitle may have been violated and has not issued a stop work order in accordance with
subsection (e) of this section, the Commissioner:
(1) shall:
[(1)] (I) issue an order for a hearing within 30 days after completing an
investigation; and
[(2)] (II) expeditiously conduct the hearing; OR
(2) MAY REFER THE MATTER TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL TO FILE A
CIVIL ACTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 17–224 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
17–224.
(a) (1) If an employee under a public work contract is paid less than the
prevailing wage rate for that employee’s classification for the work performed, the employee
may file a complaint with the Commissioner.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a complaint filed under
this section shall be subject to the provisions of § 17–221 of this subtitle.
(3) If the Commissioner’s investigation determines that the employer
violated provisions of this subtitle, the Commissioner shall try to resolve the issue
informally.
(4) (i) If the Commissioner is unable to resolve the matter informally,
the Commissioner [shall] MAY:
1. issue an order for a hearing in accordance with §
17–221 of this subtitle; OR
2. REFER THE MATTER TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL TO
FILE A CIVIL ACTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(ii) If, at the conclusion of a hearing ordered under subparagraph
[(i)] (I)1 of this paragraph, the Commissioner determines that the employee is entitled to
restitution under this subtitle, the Commissioner shall issue an order in accordance with §
17–221 of this subtitle.
(iii) If an employer of an employee found to be entitled to restitution
under subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph is no longer working under a contract with a
public body, the Commissioner may order that restitution be paid directly by the employer
to the employee within a reasonable period of time, as determined by the Commissioner.

HOUSE BILL 299
(5) If an employer fails to comply with an order to pay restitution to an
employee under paragraph (4)(iii) of this subsection, the Commissioner or the employee
may bring a civil action to enforce the order in the circuit court in the county where the
employee or employer is located.
(b) (1) If an employee under a public work contract is paid less than the
prevailing wage rate for that employee’s classification for the work performed, the
employee, OR THE COMMISSIONER ON BEHALF OF THE EMPLOYEE, is entitled to sue to
recover the difference between the prevailing wage rate and the amount received by the
employee.
(2) AN EMPLOYEE BRINGING SUIT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
SERVE A COPY OF THE COMPLAINT ON THE COMMISSIONER.
(3) A determination by the Commissioner that a contractor is required to
make restitution under subsection (a)(4) of this section does not preclude an employee from
filing an action under this subsection.
(c) (1) An action under this section is considered to be a suit for wages.
(2) A judgment in an action under this section shall have the same force
and effect as any other judgment for wages.
(3) An action brought under this section for a violation of this subtitle shall
be filed within 3 years from the date the affected employee knew or should have known of
the violation.
(d) (1) The failure of an employee to protest orally or in writing the payment
of a wage that is less than the prevailing wage rate is not a bar to recovery in an action
under this section.
(2) A contract or other written document in which an employee states that
the employee shall be paid less than the amount required by this subtitle does not bar the
recovery of any remedy required under this subtitle.
(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, if the court in an
action filed under this section finds that an employer paid an employee less than the
requisite prevailing wage, the court shall award the affected employee the difference
between the wage actually paid and the prevailing wage at the time that the services were
rendered.
(2) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, unpaid fringe
benefit contributions owed for an employee in accordance with this section shall be paid to
the appropriate benefit fund, plan, or program.
(ii) In the absence of an appropriate benefit fund, plan, or program,
the amount owed for fringe benefits for an employee shall be paid directly to the employee.

HOUSE BILL 299 19
(3) The court may order the payment of double damages or treble damages
under this section if the court finds that the employer withheld wages or fringe benefits
willfully and knowingly or with deliberate ignorance or reckless disregard of the employer’s
obligations under this subtitle.
(4) IN ADDITION TO ANY RELIEF PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPHS (1)
THROUGH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSIONER IS ENTITLED TO AN AWARD
OF LIQUIDATED DAMAGES IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 17–222 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
[(4)] (5) In an action under this section, the court shall award a prevailing
plaintiff reasonable counsel fees and costs.
[(5)] (6) If the court finds that an employee submitted a false or
fraudulent claim in an action under this section, the court may order the employee to pay
the employer reasonable counsel fees and costs.
[(6)] (7) The contractor and subcontractor shall be jointly and severally
liable for any violation of the subcontractor’s obligations under this section.
(f) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, an action filed in accordance
with this section may be brought by:
(I) one or more employees on behalf of:
1. that employee or group of employees; and [on behalf of]
2. other employees similarly situated; OR
(II) THE COMMISSIONER ON BEHALF OF:
1. ONE OR MORE EMPLOYEES; OR
2. ONE OR MORE EMPLOYEES AND OTHER EMPLOYEES
SIMILARLY SITUATED.
(2) An employee may not be a party plaintiff to an action brought under
this section unless that employee files written consent with the court in which the action is
brought to become a party to the action.
(g) (1) A person found to have made a false or fraudulent representation or
omission known to be false or made with deliberate ignorance or reckless disregard for its
truth or falsity regarding a material fact in connection with any prevailing wage payroll
record required by § 17–220 of this subtitle is liable for a civil penalty of $1,000 for each
falsified record.

HOUSE BILL 299
(2) The penalty shall be recoverable in a civil action filed in accordance
with this section and paid to the State General Fund.
(h) (1) An employer may not discharge, threaten, or otherwise retaliate or
discriminate against an employee regarding compensation or other terms and conditions of
employment because that employee or an organization or other person acting on behalf of
that employee:
[(1)] (I) reports or makes a complaint under this subtitle or otherwise
asserts the worker’s rights under this section; or
[(2)] (II) participates in any investigation, hearing, or inquiry held by the
Commissioner under § 17–221 of this subtitle.
(2) IF A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBSECTION IS FOUND AFTER A HEARING
UNDER § 17–221 OF THIS SUBTITLE, RELIEF SHALL BE AWARDED TO THE EMPLOYEE
AS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (I)(4)(I) AND (II) OF THIS SECTION.
(i) (1) A contractor or subcontractor may not retaliate or discriminate against
an employee in violation of this section.
(2) If a contractor or subcontractor retaliates or discriminates against an
employee in violation of this section, the affected employee OR THE COMMISSIONER ON
BEHALF OF THE EMPLOYEE may file an action in any court of competent jurisdiction
within 3 years from the employee’s knowledge of the action.
(3) AN EMPLOYEE BRINGING SUIT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
SERVE A COPY OF THE COMPLAINT ON THE COMMISSIONER.
(4) If the court finds in favor of the employee in an action brought under
this subsection, the court shall order that the contractor or subcontractor:
(i) reinstate the employee or provide the employee restitution, as
appropriate;
(ii) pay the employee an amount equal to three times the amount of
back wages and fringe benefits calculated from the date of the violation; and
(iii) pay reasonable counsel fees and other costs.
(J) (1) TO EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, TO ASSIST IN THE ENFORCEMENT OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE
COMMISSIONER AND THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, OR THEIR DESIGNEES, SHALL MEET
AT LEAST MONTHLY TO SHARE INFORMATION ON A MONTHLY BASIS CONCERNING
MATTERS ARISING UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, TITLE 8 OF THE GENERAL PROVISIONS

HOUSE BILL 299 21
ARTICLE, TITLE 3, SUBTITLE 9 OF THE LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT ARTICLE, AND
TITLES 16 AND 18 OF THIS ARTICLE, INCLUDING AT A MINIMUM:
(I) THE CONTENT OF COMPLAINTS OR REFERRALS RECEIVED
CONCERNING POTENTIAL VIOLATIONS AND ACTIONS TAKEN; AND
(II) THE STATUS OF INVESTIGATIONS INITIATED, INCLUDING
ANY DETERMINATION OF MERIT OR RECOVERY SOUGHT OR OBTAINED.
(2) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL REFER TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
ANY COMPLAINT OR REFERRAL ARISING UNDER THIS SUBTITLE FOR WHICH THE
COMMISSIONER HAS:
(I) NOT INITIATED AN INVESTIGATION WITHIN 6 MONTHS
AFTER RECEIPT;
(II) DECLINED TO INVESTIGATE; OR
(III) FOUND TO BE WITHOUT MERIT.
(3) (I) IN A MATTER REFERRED TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY
EXERCISE THE COMMISSIONER’S INVESTIGATIVE POWERS, INCLUDING SUBPOENA
POWERS, PROVIDED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(II) IF, AFTER AN INVESTIGATION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
FINDS A MATTER TO BE MERITORIOUS, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL PROVIDE
NOTICE TO AND CONSULT WITH THE COMMISSIONER, AFTER WHICH THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL MAY FILE A CIVIL ACTION IN THE SAME MANNER AS THE COMMISSIONER
UNDER THIS SECTION.
(4) THE EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSIONER AND THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL
COOPERATE IN THE INVESTIGATION OF ANY MATTER ARISING UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE THAT IS OF UNUSUAL SCOPE OR COMPLEXITY OR INVOLVES A NOVEL OR
COMPLEX LEGAL ISSUE.
(5) (I) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY NOT BE COMPELLED TO
SHARE INFORMATION REGARDING, OR TO COOPERATE IN THE INVESTIGATION OF, A
CIVIL ACTION FILED UNDER SEAL IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 8–104 OF THE GENERAL
PROVISIONS ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 299
(II) SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH DOES NOT
PROHIBIT THE ATTORNEY GENERAL FROM BEING COMPELLED TO COOPERATE IN
AN INVESTIGATION OF A CIVIL ACTION IF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL HAS
INTERVENED AND PROCEEDED WITH THE ACTION UNDER § 8–104(A)(6)(I) OF THE
GENERAL PROVISIONS ARTICLE.
18–107.
(a) Within 30 days after a complaint is filed, the Commissioner shall investigate
the complaint in accordance with this title.
(b) A written or oral complaint or statement made by an employee under this title
is confidential and may not be disclosed to the employer without the consent of the
employee.
(c) An employer subject to this title shall allow the Commissioner or the
Commissioner’s designee access to a work site and payroll records, and allow an
opportunity to interview employees for purposes of enforcing this title.
(d) (1) Within 30 days after completing an investigation, the Commissioner
shall:
(I) issue an order for a hearing; OR
(II) REFER THE MATTER TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL TO FILE
A CIVIL ACTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 18–109 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) Within 30 days before the hearing, the Commissioner shall serve,
personally or by mail, written notice of the hearing on all interested parties.
(3) The notice shall include:
(i) a statement of facts disclosed in the investigation; and
(ii) the time and place of the hearing.
(4) In conducting a hearing, the Commissioner may:
(i) subpoena witnesses;
(ii) administer oaths; and
(iii) compel the production of records, books, papers, and other
evidence.

HOUSE BILL 299 23
(e) (1) Within 30 days after the conclusion of the hearing, the Commissioner
shall:
(i) issue a determination; and
(ii) serve, personally or by mail, each interested party with a copy of
the determination.
(2) If the Commissioner finds a violation of this title, the Commissioner
shall determine the amount of restitution and liquidated damages to be assessed under §
18–108 of this title.
(3) On receipt of the determination, the employer shall pay the affected
employees the amount due in accordance with the Commissioner’s determination.
18–109.
(a) (1) If an employee was paid less than the wage rate required under this
title the employee, OR THE COMMISSIONER ON BEHALF OF THE EMPLOYEE AND ANY
OTHER EMPLOYEES SIMILARLY SITUATED, is entitled to sue to recover the amount of
the difference between the wage rate required under this title and the amount received by
the employee.
(2) A determination by the Commissioner that an employer is required to
make restitution does not preclude an employee from filing an action under this section.
(3) IN AN ACTION BROUGHT BY THE COMMISSIONER, THE
COMMISSIONER IS ENTITLED TO RECOVER LIQUIDATED DAMAGES AS PROVIDED IN
§ 18–108 OF THIS TITLE.
(4) AN EMPLOYEE BRINGING SUIT UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL
SERVE A COPY OF THE COMPLAINT ON THE COMMISSIONER.
(b) (1) An action under this section is considered to be a suit for wages.
(2) A judgment in an action under this section shall have the same force
and effect as any other judgment for wages.
(c) The failure of an employee to protest orally or in writing the payment of a
wage that is less than the wage rate required under this title is not a bar to recovery in an
action under this section.
18–110.
(A) TO EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, TO
ASSIST IN THE ENFORCEMENT OF THIS TITLE, THE COMMISSIONER AND THE

HOUSE BILL 299
ATTORNEY GENERAL, OR THEIR DESIGNEES, SHALL MEET AT LEAST MONTHLY TO
SHARE INFORMATION ON A MONTHLY BASIS CONCERNING MATTERS ARISING UNDER
THIS TITLE, TITLE 8 OF THE GENERAL PROVISIONS ARTICLE, TITLE 3, SUBTITLE 9
OF THE LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT ARTICLE, AND TITLE 16 AND TITLE 17,
SUBTITLE 2 OF THIS ARTICLE, INCLUDING AT A MINIMUM:
(1) THE CONTENT OF COMPLAINTS OR REFERRALS RECEIVED
CONCERNING POTENTIAL VIOLATIONS AND ACTIONS TAKEN; AND
(2) THE STATUS OF INVESTIGATIONS INITIATED, INCLUDING ANY
DETERMINATION OF MERIT OR RECOVERY SOUGHT OR OBTAINED.
(B) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL REFER TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL ANY
MATTER INVOLVING A POSSIBLE VIOLATION UNDER THIS TITLE FOR WHICH THE
COMMISSIONER HAS DECLINED TO INVESTIGATE AND WAS NOT OTHERWISE
REQUIRED TO INVESTIGATE UNDER § 18–107(A) OF THIS TITLE.
(C) (1) IN A MATTER REFERRED TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY EXERCISE THE
COMMISSIONER’S INVESTIGATIVE POWERS, INCLUDING SUBPOENA POWERS,
PROVIDED UNDER THIS TITLE.
(2) IF, AFTER AN INVESTIGATION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL FINDS A
MATTER TO BE MERITORIOUS, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE
TO AND CONSULT WITH THE COMMISSIONER, AFTER WHICH THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL MAY FILE AN ACTION IN THE SAME MANNER AS THE COMMISSIONER
UNDER § 18–109 OF THIS TITLE.
(3) THE EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION,
THE COMMISSIONER AND THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL COOPERATE IN THE
INVESTIGATION OF ANY MATTER ARISING UNDER THIS TITLE THAT IS OF UNUSUAL
SCOPE OR COMPLEXITY OR INVOLVES A NOVEL OR COMPLEX LEGAL ISSUE.
(D) (1) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY NOT BE COMPELLED TO SHARE
INFORMATION REGARDING OR TO COOPERATE IN THE INVESTIGATION OF A CIVIL
ACTION FILED UNDER SEAL IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 8–104 OF THE GENERAL
PROVISIONS ARTICLE.
(2) PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL FROM BEING COMPELLED TO COOPERATE IN AN
INVESTIGATION OF A CIVIL ACTION IF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL HAS INTERVENED
AND PROCEEDED WITH THE ACTION UNDER § 8–104(A)(6)(I) OF THE GENERAL
PROVISIONS ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 299 25
SECTION 2. AND IT BE FURTHER ENACTED, That, before October 1, 2026, the
Commissioner of Labor and Industry shall hold informational sessions for the purpose of
educating persons who have obligations under Title 3, Subtitle 9 of the Labor and
Employment Article, including as amended by this Act, and other interested parties and
stakeholders.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.